New York, session 2025-2026, S4350.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 25-111-a to read as follows: 3 § 25-111-a City planning commission to regulate the types of social 4 services facilities. a. The city planning commission shall regulate and 5 restrict requests by an agency to provide services at a new location as 6 a social services facility, to expand the size of an existing social 7 services facility or to change the type of services provided at an 8 existing social services facility, including such facilities where the 9 leaseholder is not the tenant. 10 b. For the purposes of this section, "social services facility" shall 11 include the following: 12 1. ACS placement facilities. "ACS placement facilities" means facili- 13 ties, certified by the New York state office of children and family 14 services, for the care of youth placed in accordance with the provisions 15 of the family court act and the regulations of the New York state office 16 of children and family services, managed directly by the administration 17 for children's services or under contract or similar agreement with the 18 administration for children's services. 19 2. City-administered facilities. "City-administered facilities" means 20 hotels, shelters and other accommodations or associated services, 21 managed by or provided under contract or similar agreement with any city 22 agency, provided to individuals or families who need temporary emergency 23 housing or assistance finding or maintaining stable housing. 24 3. DHS-administered facilities. "DHS-administered facilities" means 25 city-administered facilities managed directly by the department of home- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05636-01-5 S. 4350 2 1 less services or by a provider under contract or similar agreement with 2 the department of homeless services. 3 4. DYCD-administered facilities. "DYCD-administered facilities" means 4 city-administered facilities managed directly by the department of youth 5 and community development or by a provider under contract or similar 6 agreement with the department of youth and community development. 7 5. HPD-administered facilities. "HPD-administered facilities" means 8 city-administered facilities managed directly by the department of hous- 9 ing preservation and development or by a provider under contract or 10 similar agreement with the department of housing preservation and devel- 11 opment. 12 6. HRA-administered facilities. "HRA-administered facilities" means 13 city-administered facilities managed directly by the human resources 14 administration or by a provider under contract or similar agreement with 15 the human resources administration, excluding shelters for victims of 16 domestic violence managed directly by the human resources administration 17 or by a provider under contract or similar agreement with the human 18 resources administration. 19 7. Supportive housing facilities. "Supportive housing facilities" 20 means affordable, independent, and permanent housing with support 21 services for tenants, including but not limited to people who have been 22 homeless, have histories of substance abuse, are coping with mental 23 illness, have chronic illnesses such as HIV/AIDS, are young adults aging 24 out of foster care, are homeless veterans, or grandparents raising 25 grandchildren, and is under contract with a city agency including but 26 not limited to the department of health and mental hygiene and the human 27 resources administration. 28 c. The commission shall consider the anticipated impact of the 29 proposed social services facility or the operation of such facility upon 30 renewal of the lease. 31 d. The commission shall give reasonable consideration, among other 32 things, to the character of the neighborhood, its peculiar suitability 33 for particular uses, the conservation of property values, and the 34 location of social services facilities in accord with a well-considered 35 plan. 36 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 37 have become a law.